zh-CN: 音乐块音高类型: 套装（多音高）; 已调音（确定音高）; 未调音（不确定音高）; 其他
ru: Тип высоты тона музыкального блока: Набор (несколько высот тона); Настроенный (определенная высота тона); Ненастроенный (неопределенная высота тона); Другое
tr: Müzik bloğu perde türü: Set (birden çok nota); Akortlu (belirli perde); Akortsuz (belirsiz perde); Diğer
nl: Muziekblok toonhoogte type: Set (meerdere toonhoogtes); Gestemd (bepaalde toonhoogte); Ongestemd (onbepaalde toonhoogte); Overig
sv: Musikalisk blocktonhöjdstyp: Set (flera tonhöjder); Stämd (bestämd tonhöjd); Ostämd (obestämd tonhöjd); Övrigt
de: Tonhöhentyp des Musikblocks: Set (mehrere Tonhöhen); Gestimmt (definierte Tonhöhe); Ungestimmt (undefinierte Tonhöhe); Sonstige
nb: Musikalsk blokktonehøyde-type: Sett (flere tonehøyder); Stemt (bestemt tonehøyde); Ustemt (ubestemt tonehøyde); Annet
zh-TW: 音樂打擊塊音高類型: 套組 (多種音高); 已調音 (固定音高); 未調音 (無固定音高); 其他
el: Τύπος τονικότητας μουσικού μπλοκ: Σετ (πολλαπλές τονικότητες); Κουρδισμένο (καθορισμένη τονικότητα); Ακούρδιστο (ακαθόριστη τονικότητα); Άλλο
es: Tipo de tono de bloque musical: Conjunto (múltiples tonos); Afinado (tono definido); No afinado (tono indefinido); Otro
th: ประเภทระดับเสียงของบล็อกดนตรี: เซต (หลายระดับเสียง); ปรับจูนแล้ว (ระดับเสียงที่แน่นอน); ไม่ได้ปรับจูน (ระดับเสียงที่ไม่แน่นอน); อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di intonazione del blocco sonoro: Set (intonazioni multiple); Intonato (suono determinato); Non intonato (suono indeterminato); Altro
da: Type tonehøjde for musikalske blokke: Sæt (flere tonehøjder); Stemt (bestemt tonehøjde); Ustemt (ubestemt tonehøjde); Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta visine tona glazbenog bloka: Set (više tonova); Ugađano (određeni ton); Neugađano (neodređeni ton); Ostalo
pt-BR: Bloco musical tipo de altura: Conjunto (vários tons); Afinado (tom definido); Não afinado (tom indefinido); Outros
lt-LT: Muzikinio bloko tono tipas: Rinkinys (keli tonai); Suderintas (aiškus tonas); Nesuderintas (neaiškus tonas); Kita
vi: Loại cao độ khối nhạc: Bộ (nhiều cao độ); Đã chỉnh âm (cao độ xác định); Chưa chỉnh âm (cao độ không xác định); Khác
bg-BG: Тип на височината на тона на музикалния блок: Комплект (множество височини); Настроен (определена височина на тона); Ненастроен (неопределена височина на тона); Друго
fi: Rytmikapulan viretyyppi: Sarja (useita sävelkorkeuksia); Viritetty (tietty sävelkorkeus); Virittämätön (määrittelemätön sävelkorkeus); Muu
sk-SK: Typ ladenia hudobného bloku: Súprava (viacero výšok tónov); Ladený (určitá výška tónu); Neladený (neurčitá výška tónu); Iné
pl: Typ wysokości dźwięku bloku muzycznego: Zestaw (wiele wysokości dźwięku); Nastrojony (określona wysokość dźwięku); Nienastrojony (nieokreślona wysokość dźwięku); Inne
cs: Typ výšky tónu hudební kostky: Sada (více tónů); Laděné (určitá výška tónu); Neladěné (neurčitá výška tónu); Jiné
fr: Type de hauteur du bloc musical: Ensemble (plusieurs tons); Accordé (hauteur définie); Non accordé (hauteur indéfinie); Autre
ja: 音楽ブロックのピッチタイプ: セット (複数ピッチ); 調律済み (有音程); 未調律 (無音程); その他
en: Musical block pitch type: Set (multiple pitches); Tuned (definite pitch); Untuned (indefinite pitch); Other
ro-RO: Tip de tonalitate a blocului muzical: Set (acordaje multiple); Acordat (înălțime precisă a sunetului); Neacordat (înălțime nedefinită a sunetului); Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta višine tona tolkalnega bloka: Komplet (več tonov); Uglašeno (določen ton); Neuglašeno (nedoločen ton); Drugo
hu: Fadob hangmagasságának típusa: Készlet (többféle hangmagasság); Hangolt (határozott hangmagasság); Hangolatlan (határozatlan hangmagasság); Egyéb
pt-PT: tipo de altura de bloco musical: Conjunto (vários tons); Afinado (tom definido); Não afinado (tom indefinido); Outro
ko: 음악 블록 피치 유형: 세트(다중 피치); 튜닝됨(명확한 피치); 튜닝되지 않음(불명확한 피치); 기타